District of Columbia statutes.
8-2131.09

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-163, § 10, 51 DCR 3683

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Vector-Borne Infectious Diseases Control Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2005-145, September 30, 2005 ( 53 DCR 318).